test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONG_manidoo_gt-norm.yaml
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: manidooenhimiwaaiban
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: manidooenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: manidooenhiminiiban
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: manidooenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: manidooensiminaanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: manidooensiminaanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: manidooensiminaaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: manidooensimiwaaan
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: manidooensimiwaaag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: manidooensimiwaaing
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: manidooensiminian
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: manidooensiminiag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: manidooensiminiing
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: manidooenhiminaanan
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: manidooenhiminaanag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: manidooenhiminaaning
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: manidooenhimiwaaan
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: manidooenhimiwaaag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: manidooenhimiwaaing
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: manidooenhiminian
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: manidooenhiminiag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: manidooenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: manidooensimibanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: manidooensimibanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: manidooensimibaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: manidooensim***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: manidooensim***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: manidooensim***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: manidooenhimibanan
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: manidooenhimibanag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: manidooenhimibaning
     manidoo+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhim***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhim***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: manidooensishinaaniban
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: manidooensishinaan***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: manidooensishiwaaiban
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: manidooensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: manidooensishiniiban
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: manidooensishini***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: manidooenhishinaaniban
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: manidooenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: manidooenhishiwaaiban
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: manidooenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: manidooenhishiniiban
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: manidooenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: manidooensishinaanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: manidooensishinaanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: manidooensishinaaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: manidooensishiwaaan
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: manidooensishiwaaag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: manidooensishiwaaing
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: manidooensishinian
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: manidooensishiniag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: manidooensishiniing
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: manidooenhishinaanan
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: manidooenhishinaanag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: manidooenhishinaaning
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: manidooenhishiwaaan
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: manidooenhishiwaaag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: manidooenhishiwaaing
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: manidooenhishinian
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: manidooenhishiniag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: manidooenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: manidooensishibanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: manidooensishibanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: manidooensishibaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: manidooensish***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: manidooensish***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: manidooensish***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: manidooenhishibanan
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: manidooenhishibanag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: manidooenhishibaning
     manidoo+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhish***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhish***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     manidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: manidooensinaanibanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: manidooensinaanibanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: manidooensinaanibaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: manidooensinaan***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: manidooensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: manidooensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: manidooensiwaaibanan
     manidoo+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: manidooensiwaaibanag
     manidoo+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: manidooensiwaaibaning
     manidoo+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: manidooensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: manidooensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: manidooensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: manidooensiniibanan
     manidoo+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: manidooensiniibanag
     manidoo+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: manidooensiniibaning
     manidoo+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: manidooensini***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: manidooensini***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: manidooensini***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: manidooenhinaanibanan
     manidoo+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: manidooenhinaanibanag
     manidoo+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: manidooenhinaanibaning
     manidoo+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: manidooenhiwaaibanan
     manidoo+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: manidooenhiwaaibanag
     manidoo+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: manidooenhiwaaibaning
     manidoo+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: manidooenhiniibanan
     manidoo+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: manidooenhiniibanag
     manidoo+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: manidooenhiniibaning
     manidoo+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhini***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhini***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: manidooimishinaaniban
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: manidooimishinaan***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: manidooimishiwaaiban
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: manidooimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: manidooimishiniiban
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: manidooimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: manidooimishinaanan
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: manidooimishinaanag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: manidooimishinaaning
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: manidooimishiwaaan
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: manidooimishiwaaag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: manidooimishiwaaing
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: manidooimishinian
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: manidooimishiniag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: manidooimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: manidooimishibanan
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: manidooimishibanag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: manidooimishibaning
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: manidooimish***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: manidooimish***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: manidooimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     manidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: manidooiminaanibanan
     manidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: manidooiminaanibanag
     manidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: manidooiminaanibaning
     manidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: manidooiminaan***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: manidooiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: manidooiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: manidooimiwaaibanan
     manidoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: manidooimiwaaibanag
     manidoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: manidooimiwaaibaning
     manidoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: manidooimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: manidooimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: manidooimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: manidooiminiibanan
     manidoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: manidooiminiibanag
     manidoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: manidooiminiibaning
     manidoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: manidooimini***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: manidooimini***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: manidooimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     manidoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: manidooishinaanibanan
     manidoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: manidooishinaanibanag
     manidoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: manidooishinaanibaning
     manidoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: manidooishinaan***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: manidooishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: manidooishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: manidooishiwaaibanan
     manidoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: manidooishiwaaibanag
     manidoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: manidooishiwaaibaning
     manidoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: manidooishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: manidooishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: manidooishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: manidooishiniibanan
     manidoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: manidooishiniibanag
     manidoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: manidooishiniibaning
     manidoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: manidooishini***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: manidooishini***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: manidooishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nimanidooensimishinaan
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nimanidooensimishiwaa
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nimanidooensimishini
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nimanidooenhimishinaan
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nimanidooenhimishiwaa
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nimanidooenhimishini
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gimanidooensimishinaan
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gimanidooensimishiwaa
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gimanidooensimishini
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gimanidooenhimishinaan
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gimanidooenhimishiwaa
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gimanidooenhimishini
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: omanidooensimishinaan
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: omanidooensimishiwaa
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: omanidooensimishini
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: omanidooenhimishinaan
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: omanidooenhimishiwaa
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: omanidooenhimishini
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: imanidooensimishinaan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: imanidooensimishiwaa
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: imanidooensimishini
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: imanidooenhimishinaan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: imanidooenhimishiwaa
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: imanidooenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nimanidooensimishiban
